Utah statutes.
53-9-115.   Business name and address -- Posting of license -- Advertising.
(1)(a)  Subject to the provisions of this chapter, a licensee may conduct an
investigative business under a name other than the licensee's by:
(i)  complying with the requirements of Title 42, Chapter 2, Conducting
Business Under Assumed Name; and
(ii)  providing a copy of the filed certificate to the commissioner.
(b)  Failure to comply with Subsection (1)(a) shall result in the suspension
of the license.
(2)  Each licensee shall have at least one physical location from which the
normal business of the agency is conducted.  The address of this location
shall be on file with the commissioner at all times and is not a public record
pursuant to Subsection 63G-2-301(2)(b)(ii).
(3)  The license certificate issued by the commissioner shall be posted in a
conspicuous place in the principal office of the licensee.
(4)  Subject to the provisions of this chapter, a licensee may solicit
business through any accepted form of advertising.
(a)  Any advertisement shall contain the licensee's name and license number as
it appears on the license certificate.
(b)  A licensee may not use false, deceptive, or misleading advertising.
